Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-548
Pounds; establishment.

Cities of the second class and villages shall have power to provide for the erection of all needful pens and pounds within or without their corporate limits, to appoint and compensate keepers of such pens and pounds, and to establish and enforce rules governing such pens and pounds.

Laws 1879, § 69, XVII, p. 214;

Laws 1881, c. 23, § 8, XVII, p. 182;

Laws 1885, c. 20, § 1, XVII, p. 173;

Laws 1887, c. 12, § 1, XVII, p. 301;

R.S.1913, § 5122;

C.S.1922, § 4297;

C.S.1929, § 17-446;

R.S.1943, § 17-548;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 173.